Hawaii statutes.
[PART I. GENERAL PROVISIONS]

Revision Note

Sections 454F-1 to 454F-26 designated as Part I pursuant to §23G-15.

§454F-1 Definitions. In this chapter,
unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

"Advertisement" or
"advertising" means:

(1) Issuing any card, sign, or device to any person;

(2) Causing, permitting, or allowing the placement of
any sign or marking on or in any building, vehicle, or structure;

(3) Placing an advertisement in any newspaper,
magazine, or on the Internet;

(4) Listing or advertising in any directory under a
classification or heading that includes the words "mortgage loan
originator", "mortgage loan originator company", or the like;

(5) Broadcasting commercials by airwave or internet
transmission; or

(6) Transmitting any written communication,
including:

(A) A letter or a postcard that encourages a
person to borrow from or through a mortgage loan originator or a mortgage loan
originator company; or

(B) A written communication that encourages a
person to refinance the person's existing residential mortgage loan and
mentions that a new residential mortgage loan will reduce the monthly payment
the borrower will pay on the new residential mortgage loan or reduce the
interest rate on the borrower's existing residential mortgage loan.

"Applicant" means a person applying
for the issuance of a license or a renewal of a license under this chapter.

"Borrower" means the obligor, maker,
cosigner, or guarantor under a residential mortgage loan agreement. For purposes of this chapter, a borrower is included in the
term consumer.

"Branch manager" means an individual
who is designated and employed by a mortgage loan originator company to be
responsible for the activities in the conduct of business of the licensed
mortgage loan originator company's branch office or principal place of
business, in conducting the business of that mortgage loan originator company's
branch office or principal place of business.

"Branch office" means any location in
this State that is identified by any means to the public or customers as a
location at which the licensee holds itself out as a mortgage loan originator
company.

"C.F.R." means the Code of Federal
Regulations.

"Clerical or support duties" include
the following activities subsequent to the receipt of an application:

(1) The receipt, collection, distribution, and
analysis of information for the processing or underwriting of a residential
mortgage loan; and

(2) Communication with a borrower to obtain the
information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a loan, to the
extent that the communication does not include offering or negotiating loan
rates or terms or counseling borrowers about residential mortgage loan rates or
terms.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner
of financial institutions.

"Consumer Financial Protection
Bureau" means the Bureau of Consumer Financial Protection established
under title 12 United States Code chapter 53, subchapter V.

"Control" means the power, either
directly or indirectly, to direct management or policies of a company, whether
through ownership of securities, by contract, or otherwise.

"Control person" means an individual
who directly or indirectly exercises control over a licensee or applicant.

"Division" means the division of
financial institutions of the department of commerce and consumer affairs.

"Dwelling" means a residential
structure or mobile home that contains one to four family housing units or
individual units of condominiums or cooperatives.

"Elder" means an individual who is
sixty-two years of age or older.

"Employee" means an individual who
is:

(1) Hired to provide services for a licensee on a
regular basis in exchange for compensation and who does not provide these
services as part of the individual's independent business;

(2) Subject to tax withholding, the Federal Income
Contributions Act, and other lawful deductions by the licensee as a condition
of employment; and

(3) Subject to the right of the licensee to direct
and control the actions of the individual.

"Exempt registered mortgage loan
originator" means any individual who:

(1) Meets the definition of mortgage loan originator
and is an employee of:

(A) An insured depository institution; or

(B) An institution regulated by the Farm
Credit Administration; and

(2) Is registered with, and maintains a unique
identifier through, NMLS but is not required to be licensed under this chapter.

"Exempt sponsoring
mortgage loan originator company" means any person exempt from or not
included in the licensing requirements of this chapter who registers with NMLS
for purposes of sponsoring a mortgage loan originator.

"Federal banking agencies" means the
Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Comptroller of the
Currency, the National Credit Union Administration, and the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation.

"Housing finance agency" means any
authority, including any nonprofit organization:

(1) That helps meet the affordable housing needs of
the residents of the State;

(2) That is supervised directly or indirectly by the
State;

(3) That is subject to audit and review by the State;
and

(4) Whose activities make it eligible to be a member
of the National Council of State Housing Agencies.

"Immediate family member" means a
spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent, grandchild, stepparent, stepchild,
stepsibling, and equivalent adoptive relationships.

"Independent contractor" means any
person who has a contractual arrangement to perform mortgage loan originating,
underwriting, or loan processing services to a licensee, but is not an employee
of a licensee.

"Individual" means a natural person.

"Insured depository institution"
means the same as in 12 United States Code section 1813(c)(2); provided that it
also includes any credit union.

"License" means a license issued
under this chapter.

"Licensee" means a person who is
licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter. Licensee does not
include an exempt registered mortgage loan originator, exempt sponsoring
mortgage loan originator company, or nonprofit organization as defined by this
section.

"Loan processor or underwriter" means
an individual who performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the
direction of and subject to the supervision and instruction of a person
licensed or exempt from licensing under this chapter.

"Mortgage call report" means a single
report of condition that each licensee may be required to submit to NMLS.

"Mortgage loan originator":

(1) Means an individual who for compensation or gain
or in the expectation of compensation or gain:

(A) Takes a residential mortgage loan
application; or

(B) Offers or negotiates terms of a
residential mortgage loan; and

(2) Includes an independent contractor as defined in
this section.

"Mortgage loan originator company"
means:

(1) An individual not exempt under section 454F-2 who
engages in the business of a mortgage loan originator as a sole proprietorship;
or

(2) A person not exempt under section 454F-2 who
employs or contracts for the services of one or more mortgage loan originators
licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter.

"Mortgage servicer" means a person
licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 454M.

"NMLS" means a mortgage licensing
system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and
the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the state
licensing and registration of state-licensed loan originators and other
financial services providers, or any system provided by the Consumer Financial
Protection Bureau.

"Nonprofit organization" means an
organization that:

(1) Has the status of a tax-exempt organization under
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(2) Promotes affordable housing or provides
homeownership education or similar services;

(3) Conducts its activities in a manner that serves
public or charitable purposes, rather than commercial purposes;

(4) Receives funding and revenue and charges fees in
a manner that does not incentivize it or its employees to act other than in the
best interests of its clients;

(5) Compensates its employees in a manner that does
not incentivize employees to act other than in the best interests of its
clients; and

(6) Provides, or identifies for the borrower,
residential mortgage loans with terms favorable to the borrower and comparable
to mortgage loans and housing assistance provided under government housing
assistance programs.

"Nontraditional mortgage product"
means any mortgage product other than a thirty-year fixed rate residential mortgage
loan where the interest rate is fixed for the thirty-year term.

"Offers or negotiates terms of a
residential mortgage loan"
means:

(1) Presents for consideration by a borrower or
prospective borrower particular residential mortgage loan terms;

(2) Communicates directly or indirectly with a
borrower or prospective borrower for the purpose of reaching a mutual
understanding about prospective residential mortgage loan terms; or

(3) Takes or gathers information from a borrower or
prospective borrower for the purpose of recommending, referring, or steering
that borrower or prospective borrower directly or indirectly to a particular
lender or set of residential mortgage loan terms, in accordance with a duty to
or incentive from any person other than the borrower or prospective borrower.

"Person" means an individual, sole
proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, or other association of individuals, however organized.

"Principal
office" means the office location where the company's core executive and administrative functions are
primarily carried out.

"Principal place of business" means a mortgage
loan originator company's main office location in this State that is identified
by any means to the public or customers as a location at which the licensee
holds itself out as a mortgage loan originator company.

"Qualified individual" means an
individual who is responsible for the oversight of mortgage loan originators
that are employed by or contracted to perform work for a mortgage loan
originator company.

"Real estate brokerage activity"
means any activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage
services to the public, including:

(1) Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker
for a buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee of real property;

(2) Bringing together parties interested in the sale,
purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property;

(3) Negotiating on behalf of any party, any portion
of a contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of
real property other than in connection with providing financing with respect to
any such transaction;

(4) Engaging in any activity for which a person is
required to be registered or licensed as a real estate agent or real estate
broker by the State; and

(5) Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any
capacity, described in [paragraph] (1), (2), (3), or (4).

"Regular
business hours" means Monday
through Friday, between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 4:30 p.m., excluding state
holidays.

"Residential loan modification" or
"loan modification" means a temporary or permanent change to the
terms of a borrower's existing residential mortgage loan agreement, mutually
agreed to between a borrower and a lender.

"Residential mortgage loan" or
"mortgage loan" means any loan primarily for personal, family, or
household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other equivalent
consensual security interest on a dwelling or residential real estate upon
which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling, and includes
refinancings, reverse mortgages, home equity lines of credit, and other first
and additional lien loans that meet the qualifications listed in this
definition.

"Residential real estate" means any
real property located in this State, upon which a dwelling is constructed or
intended to be constructed.

"Sole
proprietorship" means a
mortgage loan originator business that is solely and personally owned and
operated by an individual mortgage loan originator, and where there is no legal
distinction between the individual business owner and the business.

"Sponsor" means to:

(1) Create a relationship through NMLS; and

(2) Appropriately supervise a mortgage loan
originator's activities.

"Taking a residential mortgage loan
application" means receipt of a request or of a response to a solicitation
of an offer from a borrower, either directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
deciding whether or not to extend an offer of a loan to the borrower. Taking a
residential mortgage loan application does not include mere physical handling
or transmission of a form.

"Unique
identifier" means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols
established by NMLS. [L Sp 2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 84, §8; am
L 2011, c 194, §2; am L 2012, c 252, §2; am L 2013, c 168, §2; am L 2014, c 9, §6
and c 198, §1; am L 2016, c 122, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next